Illinois, session 104th, SB2122.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act is 5amended by changing Section 21.3 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 620/21.3)7    Sec. 21.3. Certificates of free sale; health certificates; 8shellfish certificates.9    (a) The Department is authorized, upon request, to issue 10certificates of free sale, health certificates, or an 11equivalent, to Illinois food, dairy, drug, cosmetic, or 12medical device manufacturers, processors, packers, or 13warehousers. The Department shall charge a fee of $65 $10 for 14issuing a certificate of free sale, health certificate, or 15equivalent.16    (b) The Department shall issue an Illinois shellfish 17certificate, upon request, to shellfish firms in compliance 18with the National Shellfish Sanitation Program Model 19Ordinance.20    (c) This Section applies on and after January 1, 2003.21(Source: P.A. 97-135, eff. 7-14-11.)